Maryland, session 2026, HB1366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
4–506.
(j) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) [and], (3), AND (4) of this
subsection, all relief granted in a final protective order shall be effective for the period
stated in the order, not to exceed 1 year.
(2) [All] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, ALL relief granted in a final protective order shall be effective for the period
stated in the order, not to exceed 2 years if:
(i) the court issues a final protective order under this section against
a respondent on behalf of a person eligible for relief:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1366*

HOUSE BILL 1366
1. for an act of abuse committed within 1 year after the date
that a prior final protective order issued against the same respondent on behalf of the same
person eligible for relief expires; or
2. by consent of the respondent within 1 year after the date
that a prior final protective order issued against the same respondent on behalf of the same
person eligible for relief expires; and
(ii) the prior final protective order was issued for a period of at least
6 months.
(3) IF A RESPONDENT IS ON PROBATION AT THE TIME A FINAL
PROTECTIVE ORDER IS ISSUED, OR IF THE RESPONDENT IS PLACED ON PROBATION
DURING THE EFFECTIVE PERIOD OF A FINAL PROTECTIVE ORDER, THE RELIEF
GRANTED IN THE FINAL PROTECTIVE ORDER MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE THE
PROBATION EXPIRES OR IS TERMINATED BY COURT ORDER.
(4) A subsequent circuit court order pertaining to any of the provisions
included in the final protective order shall supersede those provisions in the final protective
order.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.